New Jersey, session 222, A2431.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Assistant Commissioner of the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services in the Department of Human Services shall facilitate the establishment of four new recovery community centers in New Jersey. For the purposes of this section, recovery community center means a non-clinical, peer-to-peer support center for people in recovery from an alcohol or other substance use disorder, which assists clients in maintaining sobriety and reestablishing ties to the community.  Services provided through recovery community centers include, but are not limited to, peer-facilitated recovery support groups, recovery coaching and mentoring, telephone recovery support, family education programs, mental health wellness groups, writing groups, art therapy, music classes, social and recreational events, on-site child care, volunteer training opportunities, advocacy training, life skills training and support, computer and Internet access, general educational development test classes, and job readiness and career preparation classes. b.    The assistant commissioner shall be authorized to accept funding as may be made available from any source to effectuate the purposes of this section, and may award grants to appropriate entities to establish or support the establishment of new recovery community centers.  An entity seeking to establish or support the establishment of a new recovery community center under this section may seek to obtain grants or other funding as may be available for that purpose from any source, including the division. c.     No later than one year after the effective date of this act, and annually thereafter, the assistant commissioner shall report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), on the status of its efforts to facilitate the establishment and operation of four new recovery community centers pursuant to this section.  Each report shall include recommendations with regard to:  (1) establishing new recovery community centers in addition to the four to be established pursuant to this section, including identifying communities which may benefit from the establishment of a new recovery community center; (2) establishing sustainable revenue streams for new and existing recovery community centers; (3) establishing links between recovery community centers and appropriate support services and resources; and (4) any legislative, executive, or agency action that may facilitate the establishment of new recovery community centers and improve the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of services provided through existing centers. 2.    The Assistant Commissioner of the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services in the Department of Human Services shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the implementation of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.